src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! !!!Skolt Saami verb morphology

!! First a lexicon V_ for still unclassified entries.

LEXICON V_
+V+WORK: # ;

LEXICON V-NEG_
+V+Neg+WORK: # ;

!! !!Irregular verbs

!! Then irregular verbs ij and the copula.

LEXICON V-NEG_IJ  !!= * @CODE@ ij:
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''

+V+Neg+Ind+Sg1:jiõˈm	   K ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Sg1:jim	   K ; !!= * @CODE@
+V+Neg+Ind+Sg2:jiõˈk	   K ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Sg2:jik	   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Sg3:ij		   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Sg4:jeäˈʹt	   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Pl1:jeäˈʹp	   K ;
+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Pl1:jeʹp	   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Pl2:jeäˈʹped   K ;
+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Pl2:jeʹped	   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jiâ	   K ;
+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jeä	   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jie	   K ;
+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jee	   K ;

+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:jieˈʹl	   K ;
+Use/NG+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:jeäˈʹl	   K ;
+Use/NG+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:jeˈʹl	   K ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:jieʹlˈled  K ;	
+Use/NG+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:jeʹlˈled   K ;	

+V+Neg+Opt+Sg2:jieˈʹl	   K ;
+Use/NG+V+Neg+Opt+Sg2:jeˈʹl	   K ;
+V+Neg+Opt+Sg3:jeälas	   K ;
+V+Neg+Opt+Pl1:jeälˈlap   K ;
+V+Neg+Opt+Pl2:jieʹlˈled  K ;
+Use/NG+V+Neg+Opt+Pl2:jeʹlˈled   K ;			
+V+Neg+Opt+Pl3:jeälˈlaz   K ;


! leeʹd
LEXICON LEED
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' for the copula
 V_LEEʹD ;
LEXICON V_LEEʹD !!= * @CODE@ leeʹd:l
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' for the copula

+V+Ind+Prs:		LEED-PRS ;
+V+Ind+Prt:		LEED-PRT ;
+V+Imprt:			LEED-IMPRT ;
+V+Imprt+Sg2:eäkˈku	K ;
+V+Imprt+ConNeg:%>eäkˈku K ;
+V:%>eʹč		CONDITIONAL ; !
+V+Pot+Sg1:%>eʹžžem K	;
+V+Pot+Sg2:%>eʹžžiǩ K	;
+V+Pot+Sg3:%>eežž	K ; !WG
+V+Pot+Sg3:%>eež	K ; !
+V+Pot+Pl1:%>eʹžžep K	; !
+V+Pot+Pl1:%>eʹžžim K	; !
+Use/NG+V+Pot+Pl1:%>eʹžžin K	; !Does this exist
+V+Pot+Pl2:%>eʹžžveʹted K	;
+V+Pot+Pl3:%>eʹžže K	;
+V+Pot+Sg4:%>eʹžžet K ;
+V+Pot+ConNeg:%>eʹžže K ;
+V+Inf:%>eeʹd K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc:%>eʹddi K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>eämˈmaž K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>eämˈma K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>eäm K ;

!! !!REGULAR VERBS
!! !CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION

LEXICON V_PÕÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
+V: V0_PÕÕLLÂD ;
LEXICON IV_PÕÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
+V+IV: V0_PÕÕLLÂD ;
LEXICON TV_PÕÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
+V+TV: V0_PÕÕLLÂD ;
LEXICON V0_PÕÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
! pos: V
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! inf: âd
! foot: 2syll
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: yes
! consonant_type: geminate-single
! gradation: yes3
! weak_grade: single
! strong_grade: geminate

!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! palatal_coloring: no (%^PALÄ, %^PALE, %^PALẸ)
! palatalization: yes (%^PAL, %^PALNo)
! velar_palatalization: FIX no (pååttaǩ)
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! pedagogical_gradation: no
! orthographic_gradation: yes
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[231] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3  = põõllâd
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: põõllâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: pââll
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: pâʹlle
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: põʹlle
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: põõl
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: põõlâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: pââlas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: põll
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: pâllaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: põl
! * Yaml: __V-moonnad__
! põõllâd:põõll
! Strong grade in penultimate syllable
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !1 põõllâd
!:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2
+Imprt+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az K ; ! pâllaz
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^VOWLower K ; ! pââll
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !3 pâʹlle
:%^VV2V%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !4 põʹlle
:%^CC2C VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !5 põõl-
+Pot+Sg3:%^CC2C%>âž   K ; !6 põõl-
+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^CC2C%>as K ; !7 pââlas
:%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !8 põll-
+Imprt+ConNegII:%^VV2V%>u K ; ! põllu
+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:%^VV2V%^CC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
+Der/ted:%^CC2C»ât  V_AALǤTED ;

LEXICON V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
+V: V0_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
LEXICON IV_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
+V+IV: V0_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
LEXICON TV_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
+V+TV: V0_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
LEXICON V0_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
! pos: V
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! inf: âd
! foot: 2syll
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: yes
! consonant_type: geminate-single
! gradation: yes3
! weak_grade: single
! strong_grade: geminate

!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! palatal_coloring: no (%^PALÄ, %^PALE, %^PALẸ)
! palatalization: yes (%^PAL, %^PALNo)
! velar_palatalization: FIX no (pååttaǩ)
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! pedagogical_gradation: no
! orthographic_gradation: yes
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[231] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3  = laukkõõllâd
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: laukkõõllâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: pââll
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: pâʹlle
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: põʹlle
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: põõl
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: põõlâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: pââlas
! (8)  Imprt.ConNegII: põll
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: pâllaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: põl
! * Yaml: __V-moonnad__
! laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
! Strong grade in penultimate syllable
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@1 laukkõõllâd
!:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2
+Imprt+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az K ; !!= * @CODE@ pâllaz
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^VOWLower K ; !!= * @CODE@ pââll
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@3 pâʹlle
:%^VV2V%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@4 põʹlle
:%^CC2C VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@5 põõl-
+Pot+Sg3:%^CC2C%>âž   K ; !!= * @CODE@6 põõl-
+Imprt+Sg3:%^CC2C%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@7 põõlas
:%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@8 põll-
+Imprt+ConNegII:%^VV2V%>u K ; !!= * @CODE@ põllu
+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:%^VV2V%^CC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
+Der/ted:%^CC2C»ât  V_AALǤTED ;

LEXICON V_VIIKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ viikkâd:viikk
+V: V0_VIIKKÂD ;
LEXICON IV_VIIKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ viikkâd:viikk
+V+IV: V0_VIIKKÂD ;
LEXICON TV_VIIKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ viikkâd:viikk
+V+TV: V0_VIIKKÂD ;
