src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
õõudâsviikkâd:õõudâsviikk V_VIIKKÂD "(eng) /(fin) edistää/(myv) /(rus) " ;
dõnnõõkkâd:dõnnõõkk V_VIIKKÂD "(eng) /(fin) /(myv) тенямс/(rus) " ;
ooudâsviikkâd:ooudâs#viikk V_VIIKKÂD "(eng) /(fin) edistää/(myv) /(rus) " ;
õõudâsviikkâd:õõudâs#viikk V_VIIKKÂD "(eng) /(fin) edistää/(myv) /(rus) " ;
aassâd:aass V_VIIKKÂD ;
bäinnõõttâd:bäinnõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
cuäŋŋšed:cuäŋŋšed V_ ;
cõuʹjjõõttâd:cõuʹjjõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
cõõjjâd:cõõjj V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
cõõkkâd:cõõkk V_VIIKKÂD ;
dåhttrõõššâd:dåhttrõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
dõndõõkkâd:dõndõõkk V_VIIKKÂD ;
groommâd:groomm V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
heerkted:heerkted V_ ;
hiâvtõõttâd:hiâvtõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
häämmed:häämmed V_ ;
ij-a:ij-a V-NEG_ ;
ij-ǥa:ij-ǥa V-NEG_ ;
iǥõl:iǥõl V_ ;
iʹlleämmaž:iʹlleämmaž V_ ;
jaškkõõttâd:jaškkõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
jeä:jeä V_ ;
jeälas:jeälas V-NEG_ ;
jeällap:jeällap V-NEG_ ;
jeällaz:jeällaz V-NEG_ ;
jeäʹl-ǥa:jeäʹl-ǥa V-NEG_ ;
jeäʹläm:jeäʹläm V_ ;
jeäʹp-ǥa:jeäʹp-ǥa V-NEG_ ;
jeäʹp:jeäʹp V-NEG_ ;
jeäʹped-ǥa:jeäʹped-ǥa V-NEG_ ;
jeäʹped:jeäʹped V-NEG_ ;
jie:jie V_ ;
jik:jik V_ ;
jiâla:jiâla V_ ;
jiõk-ǥa:jiõk-ǥa V-NEG_ ;
jiõm-ǥa:jiõm-ǥa V-NEG_ ;
joorrâd:joorr V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
joortõõllâd:joortõõll V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
juukkâd:juukk V_VIIKKÂD ;
jällʼlõõččâd:jällʼlõõčč V_VIIKKÂD ;
jällʼted:jällʼted V_ ;
jäälõõttâd:jäälõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
jõõttâd:jõõtt V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
kaajjâd:kaajj V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
kaallâd:kaall V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
kaaunõõttâd:kaaunõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
kaađđâd:kaađđ V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
klasstõõllâd:klasstõõll V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
kolsted:kolsted V_ ;
koorrâd:koorr V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
koossâd:kooss V_VIIKKÂD ;
kovšted:kovšted V_ ;
kuullâd:kuull V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
kuâllõõvvâd:kuâllõõvv V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
kuäpčted:kuäpčted V_ ;
kuõbbrõõššâd:kuõbbrõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
kuõbrõõttâd:kuõbrõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
käddstõõttâd:käddstõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
kätted:kätted V_ ;
kååmtõõllâd:kååmtõõll V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
kõnnjlded:kõnnjlded V_ ;
kõõmmâd:kõõmm V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
laannjâd:laannj V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
laiʹddstõõllâd:laiʹddstõõll V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
leezzted:leezzted V_ ;
leeʹd:l V_LEEʹD ;
liuggsed:liuggsed V_ ;
lookkâd:lookk V_VIIKKÂD ;
loollâd:looll V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
loottâd:loott V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
looǥǥõõttâd:looǥǥõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
lueǯǯjed:lueǯǯjed V_ ;
läävved:läävved V_ ;
läʹǧǧstõõttâd:läʹǧǧstõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
maannâd:maann V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
maazrded:maazrded V_ ;
miõllõõvvâd:miõllõõvv V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
moolččad:moolččad V_ ;
mulčsted:mulčsted V_ ;
muâlkkrõõššâd:muâlkkrõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
mäddõõvvâd:mäddõõvv V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
naallâd:naall V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
ni:ni V_ ;
njaakkâd:njaakk V_VIIKKÂD ;
njaavvâd:njaavv V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
njaaǥǥtõõllâd:njaaǥǥtõõll V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
njooikted:njooikted V_ ;
njoođđâd:njoođđ V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
njâʒstõõttâd:njâʒstõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
njõikkad:njõikkad V_ ;
noorrâd:noorr V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
näggrõõššâd:näggrõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
oijjšed:oijjšed V_ ;
okknõõššâd:okknõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
oocctõõllâd:oocctõõll V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
paarrâd:paarr V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
parttšõõvvâd:parttšõõvv V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
peiggõõššâd:peiggõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
peälštõõttâd:peälštõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
pieʹhssed:pieʹhssed V_ ;
piivvâd:piivv V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
piâkklõõččâd:piâkklõõčč V_VIIKKÂD ;
piârõõvvâd:piârõõvv V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
poorrâd:poorr V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
pottstõõvvâd:pottstõõvv V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
primmtõõššâd:primmtõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
pueiddad:pueiddad V_ ;
puuttâd:puutt V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
pâiʹlärvtõõllâd:pâiʹlärvtõõll V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
pävvrõõššâd:pävvrõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
pååʹmhšõõvvâd:pååʹmhšõõvv V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
põõllâd:põõll V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
põõssâd:põõss V_VIIKKÂD ;
raaktõõttâd:raaktõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
raannâd:raann V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
raiʹddjõõššâd:raiʹddjõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
reeidted:reeidted V_ ;
riâššõõttâd:riâššõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
robbtõõššâd:robbtõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
ruõnnõõvvâd:ruõnnõõvv V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
rääited:rääited V_ ;
rääkklõõččâd:rääkklõõčč V_VIIKKÂD ;
rånnõõvvâd:rånnõõvv V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
saarrâd:saarr V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
saaččâd:saačč V_VIIKKÂD ;
sieʹltted:sieʹltted V_ ;
siillâd:siill V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
skoonnâd:skoonn V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
sloiddõõttâd:sloiddõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
soojjâd:soojj V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
sookkâd:sookk V_VIIKKÂD ;
staavvâd:staavv V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
straammâd:straamm V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
stäpprõõššâd:stäpprõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
suiʹtted:suiʹtted V_ ;
suõppjõõttâd:suõppjõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
såbbrõõššâd:såbbrõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
sõõllâd:sõõll V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
sõõŋŋâd:sõõŋŋ V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
tabǯstõõttâd:tabǯstõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
teššned:teššned V_ ;
toossâd:tooss V_VIIKKÂD ;
toottâd:toott V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
trooccâd:troocc V_VIIKKÂD ;
tuejjõõttâd:tuejjõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
tuuŋŋâd:tuuŋŋ V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
tuõibbad:tuõibbad V_ ;
tääbbkõõččâd:tääbbkõõčč V_VIIKKÂD ;
tääʹvtõõttâd:tääʹvtõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
tõõrrâd:tõõrr V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
uiddâd:uiddâd V_ ;
uukkâd:uukk V_VIIKKÂD ;
vaassâd:vaass V_VIIKKÂD ;
velpped:velpped V_ ;
viikkâd:viikk V_VIIKKÂD ;
viirrâd:viirr V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
virkkõõvvâd:virkkõõvv V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
vuejjlõõččâd:vuejjlõõčč V_VIIKKÂD ;
vueʹjjed:vueʹjjed V_ ;
vuästtõõttâd:vuästtõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
vähššjõõššâd:vähššjõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
võõnnâd:võõnn V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
võʹddõõttâd:võʹdˈdõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
âʹǩǩõõššâd:âʹǩǩõõšš V_VIIKKÂD ;
älšmed:älšmed V_ ;
čaakkâd:čaakk V_VIIKKÂD ;
čaaŋŋâd:čaaŋŋ V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
čaaǥǥtõõllâd:čaaǥǥtõõll V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
čeʹǩerded:čeʹǩerded V_ ;
čuõmârlõõvvâd:čuõmârlõõvv V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
čäŋŋlõõččâd:čäŋŋlõõčč V_VIIKKÂD ;
čõõllâd:čõõll V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
škoorted:škoorted V_ ;
šlaammâd:šlaamm V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
šuuvvâd:šuuvv V_PÕÕLLÂD ;
šuuʹttõõttâd:šuuʹttõõtt V_LAUKKÕÕLLÂD ;
ǩeâštʼted:ǩeâštʼted V_ ;
